Illinois, session 104th, HB3203.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-503 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-503)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-503)7    Sec. 11-503. Reckless driving; aggravated reckless 8driving. 9    (a) A person commits reckless driving if he or she:10        (1) drives any vehicle with a willful or wanton 11    disregard for the safety of persons or property; or12        (2) knowingly drives a vehicle and uses an incline in 13    a roadway, such as a railroad crossing, bridge approach, 14    or hill, to cause the vehicle to become airborne.15    (a-5) If the person accused of reckless driving under this 16Section unintentionally caused a death or type A injury to 17another person, the trier of fact may infer that the person 18acted with a willful or wanton disregard for the safety of 19persons under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) if the person is 20issued a uniform citation for 3 or more violations of this Code 21in causing the crash. 22    (b) Every person convicted of reckless driving shall be 23guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, except as provided under   HB3203- 2 -LRB104 11972 LNS 22066 b1subsections (b-1), (c), and (d) of this Section.2    (b-1) Except as provided in subsection (d), any person 3convicted of violating subsection (a), if the violation causes 4bodily harm to a child or a school crossing guard while the 5school crossing guard is performing his or her official 6duties, is guilty of a Class 4 felony. 7    (c) Every person convicted of committing a violation of 8subsection (a) shall be guilty of aggravated reckless driving 9if the violation results in great bodily harm or permanent 10disability or disfigurement to another. Except as provided in 11subsection (d) of this Section, aggravated reckless driving is 12a Class 4 felony.13    (d) Any person convicted of violating subsection (a), if 14the violation causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 15or disfigurement to a child or a school crossing guard while 16the school crossing guard is performing his or her official 17duties, is guilty of aggravated reckless driving. Aggravated 18reckless driving under this subsection (d) is a Class 3 19felony.20(Source: P.A. 95-467, eff. 6-1-08.)